Utah statutes.
16-15-107.   Expiration of filing -- Notice.

(1)  A filing under this chapter shall be effective for a period of three years from the date of filing plus the notice period provided in Subsection (2).

(2) (a)  If no new filing is made by or on behalf of the trust who made the original filing within three years of the date of filing, the division shall send a notice by regular mail, postage prepaid, to the address shown for the registered office in the filing indicating that it will expire 30 days after the division mailed the notice.

(b)  If no new filing is made within 30 days after the date of the division mailing the notice, the business trust's registration expires.

(3)  If the registration of a business trust has expired or has been canceled for failure to maintain a registered agent, the business trust may not conduct business in this state until it has newly registered with the division under this chapter.

(4)  The division may charge a fee in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for the renewal of a registration.

